Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5781.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 2-10 of the General Laws entitled "State Forests and Forestry
Projects" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
2-10-14. Expansion of department of environmental management personnel.
The general assembly shall appropriate, in the fiscal year 2026 budget, a sum sufficient to
fund ten (10) additional full-time equivalent ("FTE") positions, to be assigned to the department of
environmental management (the "department"). It is the intent of the general assembly that these
positions be used in part to focus, support, and expand on the department's efforts in the areas of
woodlands, forests, and forestry projects.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000540
========